California statutes. Water Code
(a) Bonds may be issued by the department upon authorization by written determination of the director of the department with the approval of the Director of Finance and the State Treasurer. The Department of Finance shall notify the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairperson of the committee in each house that considers appropriations of its written determination. The bonds shall be sold at such prices and in such manner, and on such terms and conditions, as shall be specified in such determination, and such determination may contain or authorize any other provision, condition, or limitation not inconsistent herewith and such provisions as may be deemed reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. Bonds may mature at such time or times, and bear interest at such rate or rates, which may be fixed or variable and be determined by reference to an index or such other method, as shall be specified in such determination. Neither the person executing the determination to issue bonds nor any person executing bonds shall be personally liable therefor or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

(b) In the discretion of the department, any bonds may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the department and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having trust powers within or without the state, or the State Treasurer. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Treasurer shall not be deemed to have a conflict of interest by reason of acting as such trustee. The department may enter into such contracts or arrangements as it shall deem to be necessary or appropriate for the issuance and further security of the bonds.

(c) Bonds shall be legal investments for all trust funds, the funds of all insurance companies, banks both commercial and savings, trust companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries, for state school funds, pension funds, and, for any funds that may be invested in county, school, or municipal bonds.

(d) Notwithstanding that bonds may be payable from a special fund, they shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments for all purposes.

(e) Any and all bonds, their transfer and the income therefrom shall at all times be free from taxation of every kind by the state and by all political subdivisions of the state.

(f) Bonds shall not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability of the state or of any political subdivision thereof, other than the department, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any such political subdivision but shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided for. All bonds shall contain a statement to the following effect: “Neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California is pledged to the payment of the principal of or interest on this bond.” The issuance of bonds shall not directly or indirectly or contingently obligate the state or any political subdivision thereof to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatever therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment.

(g) The department may pledge or assign any revenues under any obligation entered into, and rights to receive the same, and moneys on deposit in the fund and income or revenue derived from the investment thereof, as security for the department’s obligations hereunder. It is the intention of the Legislature that any pledge of moneys, revenues, or property made by the department shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; that the moneys, revenues, or property so pledged and thereafter collected from retail end use customers, or paid directly or indirectly to or for the account of the department, is hereby made, and shall immediately be, subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act; that the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the department irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof, and that no resolution or instrument by which such pledge or lien created pursuant to this subdivision is expressed, confirmed, or approved need be filed or recorded in order to perfect such pledge or lien. The provisions hereof shall in all respects govern the creation, perfection, priority, and enforcement of any lien created hereby or hereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 6.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80134.

(a) The department shall, and in any obligation entered into pursuant to this division may covenant to, at least annually, and more frequently as required, establish and revise revenue requirements sufficient, together with any moneys on deposit in the fund, to provide all of the following:

(1) The amounts necessary to pay the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on all bonds as and when the same shall become due.

(2) The amounts necessary to pay for power purchased by it and to deliver it to purchasers, including the cost of electric power and transmission, scheduling, and other related expenses incurred by the department, or to make payments under any other contracts, agreements, or obligations entered into by it pursuant hereto, in the amounts and at the times the same shall become due.

(3) Reserves in such amount as may be determined by the department from time to time to be necessary or desirable.

(4) The pooled money investment rate on funds advanced for electric power purchases prior to the receipt of payment for those purchases by the purchasing entity.

(5) Repayment to the General Fund of appropriations made to the fund pursuant hereto or hereafter for purposes of this division, appropriations made to the Department of Water Resources Electric Power Fund, and General Fund moneys expended by the department pursuant to the Governor’s Emergency Proclamation dated January 17, 2001.

(6) The administrative costs of the department incurred in administering this division.

(b) The department shall notify the commission of its revenue requirement pursuant to Section 80110.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Department of Water Resources Electric Power Fund [80200. - 80200.]

80200.

(a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the Department of Water Resources Electric Power Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the department, and shall be available for the purposes of this division. It is the intent of the Legislature that this fund be a continuation of the fund created in Chapter 3 of the Statutes of 2001 (SB 7 of the First 2001–02 Extraordinary Session).

(b) All revenues payable to the department under this division shall be deposited in the fund. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, interest accruing on money in the fund shall remain in the fund and shall be used for the purposes of this division. Payments from the fund may be made only for the purposes authorized by this division, including, but not limited to, payments for any of the following:

(1) The cost of electric power and transmission, scheduling, and other related expenses incurred by the department.

(2) The pooled money investment rate on funds advanced for electric power purchases prior to the receipt of payment for those purchases by the purchasing entity.

(3) Payment of any bonds or other contractual obligations authorized by this division.

(4) Repayment to the General Fund of appropriations made to the fund pursuant hereto or hereafter for purposes of this division, appropriations made to the Department of Water Resources Electric Power Fund, and General Fund moneys expended by the department pursuant to the Governor’s Emergency Proclamation dated January 17, 2001. That repayment shall be made as soon as practicable.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 5 of the statute adding this section, the administrative costs of the department incurred in administering this division shall be provided in the annual Budget Act.

(d) Obligations authorized by this division shall be payable solely from the fund. Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state are or may be pledged for any payment under any obligation authorized by this division.

(e) While any obligations of the department incurred under this division remain outstanding and not fully performed or discharged, the rights, powers, duties, and existence of the department and the commission shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will affect adversely the interests and rights of the holders of or parties to such obligations. The department may include this pledge and undertaking of the state in the department’s obligations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 7.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Termination of Authority to Contract [80260. - 80260.]

80260.

On and after January 1, 2003, the department shall not contract under this division for the purchase of electrical power. This section does not affect the authority of the department to administer contracts entered into prior to that date or the department’s authority to sell electricity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Audit [80270. - 80270.]

80270.

The California State Auditor’s Office shall conduct a financial and performance audit of the department’s implementation of this division. The audit shall be completed before December 31, 2001. The office shall issue a final report on or before March 31, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 281, Sec. 43.   (SB 1395)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 27.5. STATE WATER PROJECT ENERGY PROCUREMENT [80400. - 80400.]

80400.

(a) (1) The department shall procure eligible renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources to satisfy the state agency obligations imposed on the State Water Resources Development System, commonly known as the State Water Project, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 454.53 of the Public Utilities Code.

(2) If the department determines that the full achievement of the state agency obligations imposed on the State Water Resources Development System would require the early termination of an existing contract to procure fossil generation entered before January 1, 2010, and that early termination would result in significant uneconomic costs, the department may defer procuring zero-carbon electricity resource quantities equal to the amount
 of electricity provided under the existing contract until no later than December 31, 2040.

(3) In the event that extraordinary circumstances, catastrophic events, considerable supply chain disruptions and equipment shortages, or threats of significant economic harm render full achievement of the obligations imposed on the State Water Resources Development System pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 454.53 of the Public Utilities Code infeasible, the Governor may adjust the applicable deadline for the department’s compliance to the earliest feasible date, but that date shall be no later than December 31, 2040.

(b) The department may satisfy all or a portion of the obligation on the State Water Resources Development System pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 454.53 of the Public Utilities Code by installing or connecting zero-carbon resources or eligible renewable energy
 resources behind the meter on State Water Resources Development System property or properties to service its load.

(c) All resources procured pursuant to subdivision (a) after February 1, 2022, shall satisfy both of the following criteria:

(1) The eligible renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources shall either be newly developed as a result of contracting by the department or constitute incremental production from existing resources and reach initial commercial operations on or after January 1, 2023. This requirement may be satisfied if the resource is newly developed by a local publicly owned electric utility with the expectation that the output would be sold to the department in support of the State Water Resources Development System.

(2) The eligible renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources
 shall be located within California or have a first point of interconnection to a California balancing authority.

(d) In conducting procurement pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall consider all of the following:

(1) Procurement commitments that may yield maximum long-term employment, stimulate new economic activity, generate local and state tax revenues, and assist with the development of new industries.

(2) Attributes, including resource adequacy, flexibility, and integration value, the ability to provide firm clean electricity, and local air quality benefits.

(3) The results of integrated resource planning modeling conducted by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Section 454.52 of the Public Utilities Code.

(e) The department shall consider doing all of the following to reduce the costs of any procurement made pursuant to this section:

(1) Coordinate with the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank to make low-cost financing assistance available to new projects included in any procurement commitments.

(2) Coordinate with other state agencies to identify incentives from existing programs for new projects included in any procurement commitments.

(3) (A) If reasonably expected to provide incremental benefits, secure an ownership stake or royalties for any project or economic activity resulting from a contractual commitment.

(B) (i) Incremental benefits of ownership may include the election by the department of payment of applicable credits pursuant to the federal Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169). If the department elects for direct payment of those applicable credits, those payments shall be deposited directly into the California Water Resources Development Bond Account created pursuant to Section 12935.5. 

(ii) Within 10 days of any payments being deposited in the California Water Resources Development Bond Account, described in clause (i), the department shall provide written notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, who shall provide a copy of the notice to the relevant policy committees. The notice shall include the source, purpose, timeliness, and other relevant information as determined by the department.

(f) All resources procured pursuant to this section
 shall be used first to meet the department’s own electricity needs. A renewable energy credit, as defined in Section 399.12 of the Public Utilities Code, associated with the electricity used to satisfy the obligations of the department and the State Water Resources Development System under this section shall be retired and shall not be transferred or resold.

(g) The department shall enter into an agreement to procure energy from a new energy generation facility only if the seller requires its contractors to use a multicraft project labor agreement, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code, for construction of the facility. Those project labor agreements shall conform to the industry standard agreements recently used for other similar private projects, including side letters for high-voltage transmission and related work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 53, Sec. 13.   (SB 124)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 28. WILDFIRE PREVENTION AND RECOVERY ACT OF 2019 [80500. - 80550.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [80500. - 80510.]

80500.

Nothing in this division shall be construed to reduce or modify an electrical corporation’s obligation to serve. The commission shall issue orders it determines are necessary to carry out this section.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 80502 by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 53.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

80502.

(a) The development and operation of a program as provided in this division is in all respects for the welfare and the benefit of the people of the state, to protect the public peace, health, and safety, and constitutes an essential governmental purpose.

(b) This division shall be liberally construed in a manner so as to effectuate its purposes and objectives.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 80503 by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 54.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

80504.

(a) The powers and responsibilities of the department established pursuant to this division are separate from, and not governed by, the provisions relating to the State Water Resources Development System.

(b) The Department of Water Resources Charge Fund established in Section 80550 and the moneys in that fund are separate and distinct from any other fund and moneys administered by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 79, Sec. 22.   (AB 1054)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

80506.

As used in this division, unless the context otherwise requires, all of the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Account” means the Continuation Account created pursuant to Section 3298 of the Public Utilities Code. This subdivision shall become operative upon all large electrical corporations electing to participate in the account pursuant to Section 3299 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) “Administrator” has the same meaning as defined in Section 3280 of the Public Utilities Code.

(c) “Bonds” means bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued solely for purposes of supporting the Wildfire Fund or the account and other related
 expenses incurred by the department pursuant to this division, or for reimbursing expenditures from the fund or the Wildfire Fund or the account for those purposes; repaying to the Surplus Money Investment Fund any loans made to the Wildfire Fund; establishing or maintaining reserves in connection with the bonds; costs of issuance of bonds or incidental to their payment or security; capitalized interest; or renewing or refunding any bonds.

(d) “Commission” means the Public Utilities Commission.

(e) “Electrical corporation” means a large electrical corporation, as defined in Section 3280 of the Public Utilities Code, that participates in the Wildfire Fund or the account, as appropriate.

(f) “Fund” means the Department of Water Resources Charge Fund established by Section 80550.

(g) “Wildfire Fund” means the Wildfire Fund created pursuant to Section 3284 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 81, Sec. 9.   (SB 168)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

80508.

(a) The department may prescribe, adopt, and enforce emergency regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this division. Any emergency regulations prescribed, adopted, or enforced pursuant to this division shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of such regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare.

(b) The provisions of the Government Code and Public Contract Code applicable to state
 contracts, including, but not limited to, advertising and competitive bidding requirements and prompt payment requirements, apply to contracts entered into under this division, unless the department determines that application of any of those provisions to contracts entered into under this division is detrimental to accomplishing the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 79, Sec. 22.   (AB 1054)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

80510.

All state agencies and other official state organizations, and all persons connected with those agencies and organizations, shall, at the request of the department, give the department assistance or other cooperation in carrying out the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 79, Sec. 22.   (AB 1054)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Powers of the Department [80520. - 80528.]

80520.

(a) The department may contract with an electrical corporation or its successor in the performance of related service, as an agent of the department, to provide billing, collection, and other related services on terms and conditions that reasonably compensate the electrical corporation or its successor for its services, and adequately secure payment to the department.

(b) At the request of the department, the commission shall order an electrical corporation or its successor to perform the duties pursuant to a contract described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 79, Sec. 22.   (AB 1054)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

80522.

The commission may issue rules regulating the enforcement of the agency functions pursuant this division, including collection and payment to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 79, Sec. 22.   (AB 1054)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

80524.

(a) (1) The revenue requirement for each year or, with respect to the first year and last year, the pro rata portion of the year, shall be equal to the average annual amount of collections by the department with respect to charges imposed pursuant to the revenue requirements established by the department under Section 80110 for the period from January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2018. Except as provided in paragraph (2), the
 revenue requirement shall remain in effect until January 1, 2036.

(2) The revenue requirement specified in paragraph (1) shall remain in effect until January 1, 2046, if the Public Utilities Commission imposes a nonbypassable charge pursuant to Section 3299.2 of the Public Utilities Code. This paragraph shall become operative upon all large electrical corporations electing to participate in the account pursuant to Section 3299 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) If, pursuant to Section 3289 of the Public Utilities Code, the commission makes a just and reasonable determination with respect to the revenue requirement, then the commission shall enter into an agreement with the department with respect to charges under Section 3289 of the Public Utilities Code with
 respect to the revenue requirement, and that agreement shall have the force and effect of an irrevocable financing order adopted in accordance with Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 840) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, as determined by the commission. The agreement and financing order shall provide for the administration of the revenue requirement, including provisions to the effect that (1) the department shall notify the commission each year of the annual collections received by the department with respect to the revenue requirement and the amount of any excess or deficiency in collections above or below the revenue requirement and that the commission shall adjust charges in the subsequent year to reflect any such excess or deficiency, and (2) during any revenue requirement period if the department forecasts that the revenue requirement for that period will not be met and that collections will not be sufficient to fund any of the amounts in paragraphs (1) to (5),
 inclusive,
 of subdivision (a) of Section 80544, then the department shall notify the commission in writing and the commission shall act within 30 days to increase charges so that the amounts collected during that period are sufficient to meet those obligations. For avoidance of doubt, no such adjustment to charges by the commission shall affect in any respect the commission’s just and reasonable determination with respect to the revenue requirement.

(c) (1) If, pursuant to Section 3299.2 of the Public Utilities Code, the commission makes a just and reasonable determination with respect to the revenue requirement, then the commission shall enter into an agreement with the department with respect to charges under Section 3299.2 of the Public Utilities Code with respect to the revenue requirement, and that agreement
 shall have the force and effect of an irrevocable financing order adopted in accordance with Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 840) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, as determined by the commission. The agreement and financing order shall provide for the administration of the revenue requirement, including provisions to the effect that: (A) the department shall notify the commission each year of the annual collections received by the department with respect to the revenue requirement and the amount of any excess or deficiency in collections above or below the revenue requirement and that the commission shall adjust charges in the subsequent year to reflect any such excess or deficiency; and (B) during any revenue requirement period, if the department forecasts that the revenue requirement for that period will not be met and that collections will not be sufficient to fund any of the amounts in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, subdivision (a) of Section 80544.5, then the
 department shall notify the commission in writing and the commission shall act within 30 days to increase charges so that the amounts collected during that period are sufficient to meet those obligations. For avoidance of doubt, no such adjustment to charges by the commission shall affect in any respect the commission’s just and reasonable determination with respect to the revenue requirement.

(2) This subdivision shall become operative upon all large electrical corporations electing to participate in the account pursuant to Section 3299 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 69.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

80526.

To the extent any moneys are received by an electrical corporation pursuant to Section 80520 in the process of collection, and pending their transfer to the department, those moneys shall be segregated by the electrical corporation on terms and conditions established by the department and shall be held in trust for the department’s exercise of its obligations regarding those moneys until paid over to the department pursuant to the contract or order established pursuant to Section 80520.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 79, Sec. 22.   (AB 1054)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

80528.

(a) The department may do any of the following as may be, in the determination of the department, necessary for the purposes of this division:

(1) Engage the services of private parties to render professional and technical assistance and advice and other services in carrying out the purposes of this division.

(2) Contract for the services of other public agencies.

(3) Engage in such activities or enter into such contracts or arrangements as may be necessary or desirable to carry out the department’s duties and responsibilities pursuant to this division.

(b) Hire personnel necessary and desirable for the timely and successful implementation and administration of the department’s duties and responsibilities pursuant to this division. The State Personnel Board and the Department of Human Resources shall assist the department in expediting that hiring.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 79, Sec. 22.   (AB 1054)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Bonds [80540. - 80544.5.]

80540.

(a) (1) The department may incur indebtedness and issue bonds as evidence thereof solely for purposes of supporting the Wildfire Fund and other related expenses incurred by the department pursuant to this division, provided that bonds authorized pursuant to this paragraph shall not (A) be issued in an amount the debt
 service on which, to the extent payable from the fund, is estimated by the department to exceed the amounts estimated to be available in the fund for their payment, and (B) mature after January 1, 2036.

(2) If the administrator provides the notification pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3299.1 of the Public Utilities Code, the department may incur indebtedness and issue bonds as evidence thereof solely for purposes of supporting the account and other related expenses incurred by the department pursuant to this division, provided that bonds authorized under this paragraph shall not be issued in an amount the debt service on which, to the extent payable from the
 account, including the annual contributions and additional contribution pursuant to Section 3299.2 of the Public Utilities Code, is estimated by the department to exceed the amounts estimated to be available in the account for their payment. This paragraph shall become operative upon all large electrical corporations electing to participate in the account pursuant to Section 3299 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) (1) The department may authorize the issuance of
 bonds pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), excluding any notes issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds and retired from the proceeds of those bonds, in an aggregate amount up to ten billion five hundred million dollars ($10,500,000,000).

(2) In addition to paragraph (1), if the administrator provides the notification pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3299.1 of the Public Utilities Code, the department may authorize the issuance of bonds pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), excluding any notes issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds and retired from the proceeds of those bonds, in an aggregate amount up to nine billion dollars ($9,000,000,000). This paragraph shall become operative upon all large electrical corporations electing to participate in the account pursuant to Section 3299 of
 the Public Utilities Code.

(c) Refunding bonds for any of the following purposes shall not be included in the calculation of the aggregate amount described in subdivision (b):

(1) Refunding bonds to obtain a lower interest rate.

(2) Refunding bonds bearing a variable interest rate with bonds bearing interest at a fixed rate.

(3) Refunding bonds if any nationally recognized rating agency reduces or withdraws, or proposes to reduce or withdraw, the rating assigned to securities that are secured by bond insurance policies, credit or liquidity facilities issued by the provider of a bond insurance policy, or a credit or liquidity facility securing the bonds being refunded.

(d) Before the issuance of bonds in a public offering, the department shall establish a mechanism to ensure the bonds are sold at investment grade ratings and repaid on a timely basis from pledged revenues. This mechanism may include, but is not limited to, an agreement between the department and the commission as described in Section 80524.

(e) Notwithstanding any provision of this division to the contrary, the department shall not issue any bonds pursuant to this division until the earlier of either of the following:

(1) The date on which the department shall have legally defeased all of its outstanding power supply revenue bonds issued pursuant to Section 80134 and provided written notice to the commission.

(2) The date on which the department shall have paid in full, at maturity, all of its
 outstanding power supply revenue bonds issued pursuant to Section 80134 and provided written notice to the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 70.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

80542.

(a) Bonds may be issued by the department, upon authorization by written determination of the director of the department, with the approval of the Director of Finance and the Treasurer, on terms acceptable to and approved by the administrator. The Department of Finance shall notify the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature of its written determination. The bonds shall be sold at the prices and in the manner, and on the terms and conditions, as shall be specified in that determination, and the determination may contain or authorize any other provision, condition, or limitation not inconsistent with this division and those provisions as may be deemed reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. Bonds
 may mature at the time or times, and bear interest at the rate or rates, which may be fixed or variable and be determined by reference to an index or such other method, that are specified in the determination. Neither the person executing the determination to issue bonds nor any person executing bonds shall be personally liable therefor or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of the bonds.

(b) In the discretion of the department, any bonds may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the department and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having trust powers within or outside the state, or the Treasurer. Notwithstanding any other law, the Treasurer shall not be deemed to have a conflict of interest by reason of acting as the trustee. The department may enter into such contracts or arrangements as it shall deem to be necessary or appropriate for the issuance and further
 security of the bonds.

(c) Bonds shall be legal investments for all trust funds, the funds of all insurance companies, savings and commercial banks, trust companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries, for state school funds, pension funds, and for any funds that may be invested in county, school, or municipal bonds.

(d) Notwithstanding that bonds may be payable from a special fund, the bonds shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments for all purposes.

(e) Any bonds, and the transfer of and income derived from those bonds, shall at all times be free from taxation of every kind by the state and by the political subdivisions of the state.

(f) Bonds shall not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability of the state or of any
 political subdivision thereof, other than the department, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any such political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided for. All bonds shall contain a statement to the following effect: “Neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California is pledged to the payment of the principal of or interest on this bond.” The issuance of bonds shall not directly or indirectly or contingently obligate the state or any political subdivision thereof to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatever therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment.

(g) (1) The department may pledge or assign any revenues under any obligation entered into, and rights to receive the same, and moneys on deposit in the fund and income or revenue derived from the investment thereof, as security for the department’s obligations pursuant to this
 division.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that any pledge of moneys, revenues, or property made by the department shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; that the moneys, revenues, or property so pledged and thereafter collected from retail end use customers, or paid directly or indirectly to or for the account of the department, is hereby made, and shall immediately be, subject to the lien of that pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act; that the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the department irrespective of whether those parties have notice thereof, and that no resolution or instrument by which the pledge or lien created pursuant to this subdivision is expressed, confirmed, or approved need be filed or recorded in order to perfect the pledge or lien. These provisions shall in all
 respects govern the creation, perfection, priority, and enforcement of any lien created by or under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 79, Sec. 22.   (AB 1054)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

80544.

(a) If, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 80524, the commission makes a just and reasonable determination with respect to that revenue requirement, the department shall, and in any obligation entered into pursuant to this division may covenant to, at least annually, and more frequently as required, allocate or cause to be allocated moneys collected pursuant to this division to provide any of the following:

(1) The amounts necessary to pay the principal of, and premium, if any, and interest on, bonds
 issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 80540 as and when the bonds shall become due.

(2) The amounts necessary to make payments under any contracts, agreements, or obligations entered into by it pursuant hereto, in the amounts and at the times they shall become due.

(3) Reserves in such amount as may be determined by the department from time to time to be necessary or desirable.

(4) Consistent with Section 3288 of the Public Utilities Code, repayment of loans made from the Surplus Money Investment Fund to the Wildfire Fund.

(5) The administrative costs of the department incurred in administering this division.

(6) After meeting
 the purposes in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, the transfer of any remaining revenue requirement amount to the Wildfire Fund.

(b) The commission shall not revise the revenue requirement established pursuant to
 subdivision (b) of Section 80524 at any time before January 1, 2036. For avoidance of doubt, the revenue requirement established pursuant to that subdivision shall not be imposed and collected until the department has legally defeased or paid at maturity the power supply revenue bonds issued pursuant to Section 80134 and provided written notice thereof to the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 71.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

80544.5.

(a) If, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 80524, the commission makes a just and reasonable determination with respect to that revenue requirement, the department shall, and in any obligation entered into pursuant to this division may covenant to, at least annually, and more frequently as required, allocate or cause to be allocated moneys collected pursuant to this division to provide any of the following:

(1) The amounts necessary to pay the principal of, and premium, if any, and interest on, bonds issued pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 80540 as and when the bonds shall become due.
